Illinois, session 104th, SB643.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Soil and Water Conservation Districts Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 405/1)  (from Ch. 5, par. 106)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "Soil and Water Conservation Districts Act".9(Source: P.A. 80-159.)